Hawaii statutes.
[§636C-7] Optional procedures. The
right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce a judgment instead
of proceeding under this chapter remains unimpaired. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next